Utah, session 2026, HB258.
Section 1. Section 31A-22-663 is enacted to read:31A-22-663. Coverage for reversal of sex transition procedures.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Hormonal transgender treatment" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-1-603.(b)"Primary sex characteristic surgical procedure" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-67-102.(c)"Secondary sex characteristic surgical procedure" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-67-102.(d)"Sex transition procedure" means:(i)a primary sex characteristic surgical procedure; or(ii)a secondary sex characteristic surgical procedure.(2)A health benefit plan that covers hormonal transgender treatments for an individual's sex transition shall also cover any hormonal treatments necessary to reverse an individual's sex transition.(3)A health benefit plan that covers a sex transition procedure shall also cover any surgical procedures necessary to reverse an individual's sex transition procedure.(4)This section applies to a health benefit plan renewed or entered into on or after January 1, 2027.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.